California statutes. Education Code
These classes may be convened at the hours and for the length of time during the school day or evening, and at the period and for the length of time during the school year as may be determined by the governing authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1124, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

51732.

The evening elementary schools and the special day and evening classes of the elementary schools of any school district shall be open for the admission of such minors and adults as in the judgment of the governing board of the school district maintaining the schools or classes may profit from the instruction offered.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Instruction by Correspondence [51740. - 51741.]

51740.

The governing board of a district maintaining one or more secondary schools may, subject to such rules and regulations as may be prescribed by the State Board of Education and upon the authorization of the Superintendent of Public Instruction, provide pupils enrolled in the regular day schools of the district with instruction by correspondence provided by the University of California, or other university or college in California accredited for teacher training under this code, in subjects included within or related to the course of study offered in the school and which for good reason cannot be taken by the pupil, and pay the cost thereof. Such instruction when provided for a pupil must be a part of the program of study approved for such pupil.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51741.

Notwithstanding anything in Section 51740 to the contrary, the governing board of any school district may, subject to such rules and regulations as may be prescribed by the State Board of Education and upon the authorization of the Superintendent of Public Instruction, provide veterans enrolled in schools or classes of the district with instruction by correspondence, provided by any university or college referred to in Section 51740 or by any other university, college, school, institution or organization approved by the Superintendent of Public Instruction in subjects which may be necessary to adjust the veteran to an occupation and which, for good reason, cannot be given by the school, and pay for the cost thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.5. Independent Study [51744. - 51749.6.]

51744.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that by offering a range of quality educational options, including classroom-based, hybrid, and nonclassroom-based programs, local educational agencies can better tailor instruction to pupils, thereby improving academic outcomes while maximizing enrollment.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that local educational agencies offer educational programs that best serve the needs of their pupils.

(c) It is also the intent of the Legislature to encourage local educational agencies, when adopting a written policy pursuant to Section 51747 or 51749.5, to consider offering more than one independent study model for short- and long-term
 placements in accordance with Sections 51747, 51747.5, and 51749.6.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 52, Sec. 72.   (AB 181)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

51745.

(a) Commencing with the 1990–91 school year, a local educational agency may offer independent study to meet the educational needs of pupils in accordance with the requirements of this article. For the 2021–22 school year only, the governing board of a school district or a county office of education shall offer independent study to meet the educational needs of pupils. Educational opportunities offered through independent study may include, but shall not be limited to, the following:

(1) Special assignments extending the content of regular courses of instruction.

(2) Individualized study in a particular area of interest or in a subject not currently available in the regular school curriculum.

(3) Continuing and special study during travel.

(4) Volunteer community service activities and leadership opportunities that support and strengthen pupil achievement.

(5) Individualized study for a pupil whose health would be put at risk by in-person instruction, as determined by the parent or guardian of the pupil, or a pupil who is unable to attend in-person instruction due to a quarantine due to exposure to, or infection with, COVID-19, pursuant to local or state public health guidance.

(b) Beginning July 1, 2021, with the exception of pupils participating in independent study programs due to an emergency, as described in Sections 41422 and 46392, not more than 10 percent of the pupils participating in an opportunity school or program, or a continuation high school, calculated as specified by the department, shall be eligible for apportionment credit for independent study pursuant to this article. A
 pupil who is pregnant or is a parent who is the primary caregiver for one or more of their children shall not be counted within the 10 percent cap.

(c) An individual with exceptional needs, as defined in Section 56026, may participate in independent study, if the pupil’s individualized education program developed pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 56340) of Chapter 4 of Part 30 specifically provides for that participation. If a parent or guardian of an
 individual with exceptional needs requests independent study pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (a), the pupil’s individualized education program team shall make an individualized determination as to whether the pupil can receive a free appropriate public education in an independent study placement. A pupil’s inability to work independently, the pupil’s need for adult support, or the pupil’s need for special education or related services shall not preclude the individualized education program team from determining that the pupil can receive a free appropriate education in an independent study placement.

(d) A temporarily disabled pupil shall not receive individual instruction pursuant to Section 48206.3 through independent study.

(e) No course included among the courses required for high school graduation under Section 51225.3 shall be offered
 exclusively through independent study.

(f) The governing board of a school district or county office of education may meet the requirement to offer independent study for the 2021–22 school year described in subdivision (a) by contracting with a county office of education or by entering into an interdistrict transfer agreement with another school district pursuant to Section 46600.

(g) The requirement to offer independent study for the 2021–22 school year described in subdivision (a) may be waived for school districts by the county superintendent of schools in the county in which the school district is located and waived for county offices of education and school districts in single-district counties by the Superintendent if the school district or county office of education, as applicable, demonstrates both of the following:

(1) Offering independent study would create an unreasonable fiscal burden on the school district or county office of education due to low numbers of pupils participating or other extenuating circumstances.

(2) The governing board of the school district or county office of education does not have the option to enter into an interdistrict transfer agreement with another school district or to contract with a county office of education to provide an independent study option, as described in subdivision (f).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 52, Sec. 73.   (AB 181)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

51745.5.

For purposes of this article the following definitions apply:

(a) “Live interaction” means interaction between the pupil and local educational agency classified or certificated staff, and may include peers, provided for the purpose of maintaining school connectedness, including, but not limited to, wellness checks, progress monitoring, provision of services, and instruction. This interaction may take place in person, or in the form of internet or telephonic communication.

(b) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(c) “Pupil-parent-educator conference” means a meeting involving, at a minimum,
 all parties who signed the pupil’s written independent study agreement pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 51747 or the written learning agreement pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 51749.6.

(d) “Synchronous instruction” means classroom-style instruction or designated small group or one-on-one instruction delivered in person, or in the form of internet or telephonic communications, and involving live two-way communication between the teacher and pupil. Synchronous instruction shall be provided by a teacher or teachers of record for that pupil pursuant to Section 51747.5 or the certificated employee of the local educational agency providing instruction for course-based independent study.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 52, Sec. 74.   (AB 181)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

51745.6.

(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the ratio of average daily attendance for independent study pupils 18 years of age or less for a school district or county office of education, and for independent study pupils regardless of age for a charter school, to full-time equivalent certificated employees
 responsible for independent study, calculated as specified by the department, shall be in compliance with one of the following:

(A) It shall not exceed the equivalent ratio
 of average daily attendance to full-time equivalent certificated employees providing instruction in other educational programs operated by the school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(B) It shall not exceed the equivalent prior year ratio of
 average daily attendance to full-time equivalent certificated employees for all other educational programs operated by the high school or unified school district with the largest average daily attendance of pupils in the county or the collectively bargained alternative ratio used by that high school or unified school district in the prior year. In the case of a charter school serving pupils in more than one county, the ratio shall not exceed the ratio of the high school or unified school district with the average daily attendance of pupils in the county in which the chartering authority is located. The computation of the ratios shall be performed annually by the reporting agency at the time of, and in connection with, the second principal apportionment report to the Superintendent. A high school or unified school district shall annually report the attendance ratios to the county superintendent of schools by a date established by the county superintendent of schools. The county superintendent of schools shall annually report the attendance ratios on their internet website.

(C) It shall not exceed a fixed average-daily-attendance-to-certificated-employee ratio of 25 to 1, or a fixed ratio of less than 25 pupils per certificated employee.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a new higher or lower ratio for all other educational programs offered by a school district, county office of education, or charter school may be negotiated in a collective bargaining agreement, or a memorandum of understanding is entered into that indicates an existing collective bargaining agreement contains an alternative average daily attendance ratio.

(b) Only those units of average daily attendance for independent study that reflect a pupil-teacher ratio that does not exceed the ratios described in subdivision (a) shall be eligible for apportionment pursuant to Section
 2575 for county offices of education, and Section 42238.05 for school districts. This section does not prevent a school district or county office of education from serving additional units of average daily attendance greater than the ratios described in subdivision (a), except that those additional units shall not be funded pursuant to Section 2575 or 42238.05, as applicable. If a school district, charter school, or county office of education has a memorandum of understanding to provide instruction in coordination with the school district, charter school, or county office of education at which a pupil is enrolled, the ratios that shall apply for purposes of this paragraph are the ratios for the local educational agency providing the independent study program to the
 pupil pursuant to Section 51749.5.

(c) The calculations performed for purposes of this section shall not include either of the following:

(1) The average daily attendance generated by special education pupils enrolled in special day classes on a full-time basis, or the teachers of those classes.

(2) The average daily attendance or teachers in necessary small schools that are eligible to receive funding pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 42280) of Chapter 7 of Part 24 of Division 3.

(d) Commencing with the 2021–22 fiscal year Guide for Annual Audits of K–12 Local Education Agencies and State Compliance Reporting, the Controller shall incorporate verification of the ratios included in this section, including fiscal penalties for noncompliance as described in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 103.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

51746.

It is the intent of the Legislature that school districts and county offices of education offering independent study shall provide appropriate existing services and resources to enable pupils to complete their independent study successfully and shall ensure the same access to all existing services and resources in the school in which the pupil is enrolled pursuant to Section 51748 as is available to all other pupils in the school. In addition, the services and resources may include, but need not be limited to, any of the following:

(a) A designated learning center or study area staffed by appropriately trained personnel.

(b) The services of qualified personnel to assess the
 achievement, abilities, interests, aptitudes, and needs of participating pupils to determine each of the following:

(1) Whether full-time independent study is the most appropriate placement for the pupil being referred.

(2) If the answer to paragraph (1) is affirmative, the determination of the most appropriate individualized plan and resources to be made available to pupils enrolled in full-time independent study.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 52, Sec. 75.   (AB 181)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

51747.

A local educational agency shall not be eligible to receive apportionments for independent study by pupils, regardless of age, unless it has adopted written policies, and has implemented those policies, pursuant to rules and regulations adopted by the Superintendent, that include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(a) The maximum length of time, by grade level and type of program, that may elapse between the time an independent study assignment is made and the date by which the pupil must complete the assigned work.

(b) (1) The level of satisfactory educational progress and the number of missed assignments that will be allowed before an evaluation is conducted to determine whether it is in
 the best interests of the pupil to remain in independent study, or whether the pupil should return to the regular school program. A written record of the findings of any evaluation made pursuant to this subdivision shall be treated as a mandatory interim pupil record. The record shall be maintained for a period of three years from the date of the evaluation and, if the pupil transfers to another California public school, the record shall be forwarded to that school.

(2) Satisfactory educational progress shall be determined based on all of the following indicators:

(A) The pupil’s achievement and engagement in the independent study program, as indicated by the pupil’s performance on applicable pupil-level measures of pupil achievement and pupil engagement set forth in paragraphs (4) and (5) of subdivision (d) of Section 52060.

(B) The completion of assignments, assessments, or other indicators that evidence that the pupil is working on assignments.

(C) Learning required concepts, as determined by the supervising teacher.

(D) Progressing toward successful completion of the course of study or individual course, as determined by the supervising teacher.

(c) The provision of content aligned to grade level standards that is substantially equivalent to in-person instruction. For high schools, this shall include access to all courses offered by the local educational agency for graduation and approved by the University of California or the California State University as creditable under the A–G admissions criteria.

(d) Procedures for tiered reengagement strategies for
 all pupils who are not generating attendance for more than 10 percent of required minimum instructional time over four continuous weeks of a local educational agency’s approved instructional calendar, pupils found not participatory in synchronous instructional offerings pursuant to Section 51747.5 for more than 50 percent of the scheduled times of synchronous instruction in a school month as applicable by grade span, or pupils who are in violation of the written agreement pursuant to subdivision (g). These procedures shall include local programs intended to address chronic absenteeism, as applicable, with at least all of the following:

(1) Verification of current contact information for each enrolled pupil.

(2) Notification to parents or guardians of lack of participation within one school day of the recording of a nonattendance day or lack of participation.

(3) A plan for outreach from the school to determine pupil needs, including connection with health and social services as necessary.

(4) A clear standard for requiring a pupil-parent-educator conference to review a pupil’s written agreement, and reconsider the independent study program’s impact on the pupil’s achievement and well-being, consistent with the policies adopted pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (g).

(e) (1) For pupils in transitional kindergarten and grades 1 to 3, inclusive, a plan to provide opportunities for daily synchronous instruction for all pupils throughout the school year.

(2) For pupils in grades 4 to 8, inclusive, a plan to provide opportunities for both daily live interaction and at least weekly
 synchronous instruction for all pupils throughout the school year.

(3) For pupils in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, a plan to provide opportunities for at least weekly synchronous instruction for all pupils throughout the school year.

(f) A plan to transition pupils whose families wish to return to in-person instruction from independent study expeditiously, and, in no case, later than five instructional days.

(g) A requirement that a current written agreement for each independent study pupil shall be maintained on file, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) The manner, time, frequency, and place for submitting a pupil’s assignments, for reporting the pupil’s academic progress, and for communicating with a pupil’s parent or guardian
 regarding a pupil’s academic progress.

(2) The objectives and methods of study for the pupil’s work, and the methods used to evaluate that work.

(3) The specific resources, including materials and personnel, that will be made available to the pupil. These resources shall include confirming or providing access to all pupils to the connectivity and devices adequate to participate in the educational program and complete assigned work.

(4) A statement of the policies adopted pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) regarding the maximum length of time allowed between the assignment and the completion of a pupil’s assigned work, the level of satisfactory educational progress, and the number of missed assignments allowed before an evaluation of whether or not the pupil should be allowed to continue in independent study.

(5) The duration of the independent study agreement, including the beginning and ending dates for the pupil’s participation in independent study under the agreement. No independent study agreement shall be valid for any period longer than one school year.

(6) A statement of the number of course credits or, for the elementary grades, other measures of academic accomplishment appropriate to the agreement, to be earned by the pupil upon completion.

(7) A statement detailing the academic and other supports that will be provided to address the needs of pupils who are not performing at grade level, or need support in other areas, such as English learners, individuals with exceptional needs in order to be consistent with the pupil’s individualized education program or plan pursuant to Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation
 Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794), pupils in foster care or experiencing homelessness, and pupils requiring mental health supports.

(8) The inclusion of a statement in each independent study agreement that independent study is an optional educational alternative in which no pupil may be required to participate. In the case of a pupil who is referred or assigned to any school, class, or program pursuant to Section 48915 or 48917, the agreement also shall include the statement that instruction may be provided to the pupil through independent study only if the pupil is offered the alternative of classroom instruction.

(9) (A) (i) For a pupil participating in an independent study program that is scheduled for more than 15 schooldays, each written agreement shall be signed, before the commencement of independent study, by the pupil, the
 pupil’s parent, legal guardian, or caregiver, if the pupil is less than 18 years of age, the certificated employee who has been designated as having responsibility for the general supervision of independent study, and the certificated employee designated as having responsibility for the special education programming of the pupil, as applicable.

 (ii) For a pupil participating in an independent study program that is scheduled for 15 schooldays or fewer, each written agreement shall be signed, during the school year in which the independent study program takes place, by the pupil, the pupil’s parent, legal guardian, or caregiver, if the pupil is less than 18 years of age, the certificated employee who has been designated as having responsibility for the general supervision of independent study, and the certificated employee designated as having responsibility for the special education programming of the pupil, as applicable. The written agreement
 may be signed at any time during the school year, but it is the intent of the Legislature that parents or guardians of pupils be provided the agreement at or before the beginning of the school year.

(iii) For purposes of this paragraph, “caregiver” means a person who has met the requirements of Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 6550) of Division 11 of the Family Code.

(B) Signed written agreements, supplemental agreements, assignment records, work samples, and attendance records assessing time value of work or evidence that an instructional activity occurred may be maintained as an electronic file.

(C) For purposes of this section, an electronic file includes a computer or electronic stored image of an original document, including, but not limited to, portable document format (PDF), JPEG, or other digital image file
 type, that may be sent via fax machine, email, or other electronic means.

(D) Either an original document or an electronic file of the original document is allowable documentation for auditing purposes.

(E) Written agreements may be signed using an electronic signature that complies with state and federal standards, as determined by the department, that may be a marking that is either computer generated or produced by electronic means and is intended by the signatory to have the same effect as a handwritten signature. The use of an electronic signature shall have the same force and effect as the use of a manual signature if the requirements for digital signatures and their acceptable technology, as provided in Section 16.5 of the Government Code and in Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 22000) of Division 7 of Title 2 of the California Code of Regulations, are satisfied.

(F) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), for the 2021–22 school year only, a local educational agency shall obtain a signed written agreement for an independent study program of any length of time from the pupil, or the pupil’s parent or legal guardian if the pupil is less than 18 years of age, the certificated employee who has been designated as having responsibility for the general supervision of independent study, and the certificated employee designated as having responsibility for the special education programming of the pupil, as applicable, no later than 30 days after the first day of instruction in an independent study program or October 15, whichever date comes later. This subparagraph does not relieve a local educational agency from the obligation to comply with the requirements of this article, as amended by the act adding this subparagraph, upon commencement of instruction for a participating pupil in the 2021–22 school year.

(h) (1) For the 2021–22 school year only, school districts and county offices of education shall notify the parents and guardians of all enrolled pupils of their options to enroll their child in in-person instruction or independent study during the 2021–22 school year. This notice shall include written information on the local educational agency’s internet website, including, but not limited to, the right to request a pupil-parent-educator conference meeting before enrollment pursuant to this section, pupil rights regarding procedures for enrolling, disenrolling, and reenrolling in independent study, and the synchronous and asynchronous instructional time that a pupil will have access to as part of independent study. If 15 percent or more of the pupils enrolled in a local educational agency that provides instruction in transitional kindergarten, kindergarten, or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, speak a single primary
 language other than English, as determined from the census data submitted to the department pursuant to Section 52164 in the preceding year, the written information shall, in addition to being written in English, be written in the primary language.

(2) Before signing a written agreement pursuant to this section, the parent or guardian of a pupil may request that the local educational agency conduct a telephone, videoconference, or in-person pupil-parent-educator conference or other school meeting during which the pupil, parent or guardian, and, if requested by the pupil or parent, an education advocate, may ask questions about the educational options, including which curriculum offerings and nonacademic supports will be available to the pupil in independent study, before making the decision about enrollment or disenrollment in the various options for learning.

(i) Subdivisions
 (d), (e), and (f) shall not apply to pupils that participate in an independent study program for fewer than 16 schooldays in a school year and pupils enrolled in a comprehensive school for classroom-based instruction who, under the care of appropriately licensed professionals, participate in independent study due to necessary medical treatments or inpatient treatment for mental health care or substance abuse. Local educational agencies shall obtain evidence from appropriately licensed professionals of the need for pupils to participate in independent study pursuant to this subdivision.

(j) (1) Notwithstanding paragraph (8) of subdivision (g) of this section, paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 46300, and subdivision (d) of Section 51745, for the 2021–22 school year only, a local educational agency shall be eligible to receive apportionments for independent study for pupils that are subject to quarantine for
 exposure to, or infection with, COVID-19 pursuant to local or state health guidance, and the pupil cannot participate in classroom-based instruction due to the quarantine, and for school closures due to COVID-19 pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 41422. Local educational agencies shall receive apportionment for these pupils for all schooldays that they participate in and meet all other apportionment requirements of independent study while in quarantine or during a school closure.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 47612.5, for the 2021–22 fiscal year, a classroom-based charter school that provides an independent study program pursuant to this article for pupils that are subject to quarantine for exposure to, or infection with, COVID-19 pursuant to local or state health guidance, and the pupil cannot participate in classroom-based instruction due to the quarantine, shall not attribute quarantine-based independent study average daily attendance
 required pursuant to law for a nonclassroom-based charter school pursuant to Section 47612.5 and shall not be required to submit a request for a funding determination as a result of providing independent study to quarantined pupils.

(3) This subdivision shall apply only to pupils participating in independent study due to quarantine who do not have the option of in-person instruction, and only for the period of quarantine mandated pursuant to state or local health guidance or order. This subdivision shall not apply to classroom-based charter schools offering independent study to pupils whose parents or guardians have requested independent study pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 51745.

(k) Commencing with the 2021–22 fiscal year Guide for Annual Audits of K–12 Local Education Agencies and State Compliance Reporting, the Controller shall incorporate verification of the adoption
 of the policies required pursuant to this section, including loss of apportionment for independent study for local educational agencies found to be noncompliant, unless compliance verification for those policies is already included in the audit guide.

(l) The provisions of this section are not subject to waiver by the state board, by the Superintendent, or under any provision of Part 26.8 (commencing with Section 47600).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 65.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

51747.3.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a local educational agency, including, but not limited to, a charter school, may not claim state funding for the independent study of a pupil, whether characterized as home study or otherwise, if the local educational agency has provided any funds or other thing of value to the pupil or the pupil’s parent or guardian that the local educational agency does not provide to pupils who attend regular classes or to their parents or guardians. A charter school may not claim state funding for the independent study of a pupil, whether characterized as home study or otherwise, if the charter school
 has provided any funds or other thing of value to the pupil or the pupil’s parent or guardian that a school district could not legally provide to a similarly situated pupil of the school district, or to the pupil’s parent or guardian.

(b) Providing access to connectivity and local educational agency-owned devices adequate to participate in an independent study program and complete assigned work, consistent with paragraph (3) of subdivision (g) of Section 51747, or to participate in an independent study course, as authorized in Section 51749.5, shall not be considered funds or other things of value for purposes of subdivision (a).

(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 47605 or any other law, community school and independent study average daily attendance shall be claimed by school districts, county superintendents of schools, and charter schools only for pupils who are residents of the county in which the apportionment claim is reported, or who are residents of a county immediately adjacent to the county in which the apportionment claim is reported.

(d) The Superintendent shall not apportion funds for reported average daily attendance, through full-time independent study, of pupils who are enrolled in school pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 48204.

(e) In conformity with Provisions 25 and 28 of Item 6110–101–001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 1992, this section applies to average daily attendance reported for apportionment purposes beginning July 1, 1992.

(f) The
 provisions of this section are not subject to waiver by the state board, by the Superintendent, or under any provision of Part 26.8 (commencing with Section 47600).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 44, Sec. 70.   (AB 130)   Effective July 9, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

51747.5.

(a) The independent study by each pupil shall be coordinated, evaluated, and, notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 46300, shall be under the general supervision of an employee of the local educational agency who possesses a valid certification document pursuant to Section 44865 or an emergency credential pursuant to Section 44300, registered as required by law.

(b) (1) A local educational agency may claim apportionment credit for independent study only to the extent of the time value of pupil work products, as personally judged in each instance by a certificated teacher employed by the local educational agency, or the combined time value of pupil work product and pupil participation in synchronous instruction pursuant to paragraph
 (2). It is the intent of the Legislature that teachers be given access to digital assignment tracking systems to reduce workload associated with evaluating and accounting for pupil work and synchronous instruction participation.

(2) For purposes of computing average daily attendance for each pupil enrolled in independent study pursuant to Section 51747, the following computations shall apply:

(A) (i) For each schoolday, add the combined equivalent daily time value of pupil work products, as personally judged by a certificated employee of the local educational agency.

(ii) For purposes of this section, pupil work products may include the daily time value spent by a pupil engaged in asynchronous instruction, including work completed on an online or computer-based instructional activity, regardless
 of whether pupil work products are produced, if the computer program documents pupil participation. The local educational agency shall maintain documentation of hours or fraction of an hour of both pupil work products and the time that the pupil engaged in asynchronous instruction.

(iii) (I) Except as provided in subclause (II), a local educational agency shall maintain one completed pupil work product in each of the subjects of English language arts, mathematics, history-social science, and science for a pupil enrolled in independent study for each of three attendance periods as follows:

(ia) The beginning of the school year through the first attendance period.

(ib) The day following the end of the first
 attendance period to the end of the school’s second attendance period.

(ic) The day following the end of the school’s second attendance period to the end of the school year.

(II) Notwithstanding subclause (I), if a pupil is not enrolled in one or more of the subjects identified in subclause (I) during an attendance period, the local educational agency shall maintain four completed pupil work products per attendance period that are representative of the pupil’s course schedule.

(B) (i) For each schoolday, add the combined daily instructional minutes a pupil participated in synchronous instruction, as defined by subdivision (d) of Section 51745.5 and offered pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 51747, for which evidence of pupil participation is furnished and maintained.
 Evidence of pupil participation may include, but is not limited to, pupil work produced or performed, or documentation that the pupil participated in an instructional period either visually or verbally, as verified by a certificated employee and maintained by the local educational agency for each hour or fraction thereof of the synchronous instructional offering.

(ii) Pursuant to paragraph (1), a local educational agency may claim apportionment credit in this paragraph insofar as a pupil’s participation in a synchronous instructional offering augments the time value of pupil work product.

(C) For each schoolday, add the sum of subparagraphs (A) and (B). If the sum of subparagraphs (A) and (B) meets the applicable minimum schoolday requirements for each schoolday, and all other requirements in this section have been met, each schoolday shall be credited as up to one schoolday of
 attendance.

(3) The average daily attendance computed pursuant to this subdivision shall not result in more than one unit of average daily attendance per pupil.

(4) Notwithstanding any other law, average daily attendance computed for pupils enrolled in independent study shall not be credited with average daily attendance other than what is specified in this section.

(c) A local educational agency shall document each pupil’s participation in live interaction and synchronous instruction pursuant to Section 51747 on each schoolday, as applicable, in whole or in part, for which live interaction or synchronous instruction is provided as part of the independent study program. A pupil who does not participate in scheduled live interaction or synchronous instruction shall be documented as nonparticipatory for that schoolday
 for purposes of pupil participation reporting and tiered reengagement pursuant to Section 51747.

(d) A local educational agency shall maintain written or computer-based evidence of pupil engagement that includes, but is not limited to, a grade book or summary document that, for each class, lists all assignments, assessments, and associated grades.

(e) For purposes of this section, a local educational agency shall not be required to sign and date pupil work products when assessing the time value of pupil work products for apportionment purposes.

(f) Commencing with the 2021–22 fiscal year Guide for Annual Audits of K–12 Local Education Agencies and State Compliance Reporting, the Controller shall incorporate compliance reviews for subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, unless compliance verification for those
 subdivisions is already included in the audit guide. Findings of noncompliance shall result in the loss of apportionment equal to the average daily attendance impacted by the noncompliance.

(g) The provisions of this section are not subject to waiver by the state board, by the Superintendent, or under any provision of Part 26.8 (commencing with Section 47600).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 104.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

51748.

School districts and county offices of education shall not be eligible to receive apportionment for independent study attendance by any pupil who is not otherwise identified in the written records of the district or county board by grade level, program placement, and the school in which he or she is enrolled.
